tests/runtime/marklimit.sbl
// Test `setmark`/`tomark`/`atmark`/`tolimit`/`atlimit`.

externals (stem)

integers (x)

strings (s)

define stem as (
  not atlimit or fail='atlimit true initially'
  test (tolimit atlimit) or fail='not atlimit after tolimit'
  test (tolimit atmark limit) or fail='not atmark limit after tolimit'

  atmark 0 or fail='not at atmark 0 at start'
  not atmark 1 or fail='atmark 1 at start'

  setmark x
  $(x == 0) or fail='setmark at start not 0'
  atmark x or fail='not at atmark x after setmark x'

  next
  setmark x
  $(x != 0) or fail='setmark after next still 0'
  atmark x or fail='not at atmark x after setmark x (2)'
  not atlimit or fail='atlimit true after next'

  tolimit
  setmark x
  $(x == limit) or fail='setmark not limit after tolimit'
)
